apertium-ara-heb.heb.dix
    <pardef n="שומש/ום__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ום</l><r>ום<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מים</l><r>ום<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מין</l><r>ום<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ג/ובה__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ובה</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובה</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהי</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהנו</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהך</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהך</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהכם</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהכן</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהן</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהו</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהה</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהם</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהים</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהי</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהיי</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהינו</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהיך</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהייך</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהיכם</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהיכן</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהיהן</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהיו</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>בהיה</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ובהיהם</l><r>ובה<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="בו/ם__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מים</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מי</l><r>ם<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ע/יפרון__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>יפרון</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרון</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרוני</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרוננו</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונך</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונך</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונכם</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונכן</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונן</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונו</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונה</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונם</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונות</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונות</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיי</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותינו</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיך</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותייך</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיכם</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיכן</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיהן</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיו</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיה</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פרונותיהם</l><r>יפרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="אר/ץ__n_f">
      <!-- TODO complete pardef -->
      <e><p>          <l>ץ</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ץ</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צי</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צנו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צכם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צכן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צה</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="רקוויאם"><par n="ה"/><i>רקוויא</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חמאם"><par n="ה"/><i>חמא</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הומונים"><par n="ה"/><i>הומוני</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בום"><par n="ה"/><i>בו</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קרם"><par n="ה"/><i>קר</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ארץ"><par n="ה"/><i>אר</i><par n="אר/ץ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קילוגרם"><par n="ה"/><i>קילוגר</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טרנספורם"><par n="ה"/><i>טרנספור</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אנכרוניזם"><par n="ה"/><i>אנכרוניז</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיליגרם"><par n="ה"/><i>מיליגר</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פלינדרום"><par n="ה"/><i>פלינדרו</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עב'ם"><par n="ה"/><i>עב"</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פריים"><par n="ה"/><i>פריי</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בוידעם"><par n="ה"/><i>בוידע</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שומשום"><par n="ה"/><i>שומש</i><par n="שומש/ום__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פולינום"><par n="ה"/><i>פולינו</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קרמטוריום"><par n="ה"/><i>קרמטוריו</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קונסיליום"><par n="ה"/><i>קונסיליו</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיקרופילם"><par n="ה"/><i>מיקרופיל</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פסידונים"><par n="ה"/><i>פסידוני</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיקרוגרם"><par n="ה"/><i>מיקרוגר</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אורגניזם"><par n="ה"/><i>אורגניז</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סינונים"><par n="ה"/><i>סינוני</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מכ'ם"><par n="ה"/><i>מכ"</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גובה"><par n="ה"/><i>ג</i><par n="ג/ובה__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רקטום"><par n="ה"/><i>רקטו</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חולם"><par n="ה"/><i>חול</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פסבדונים"><par n="ה"/><i>פסבדוני</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קוליפורם"><par n="ה"/><i>קוליפור</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אייטם"><par n="ה"/><i>אייט</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נאולוגיזם"><par n="ה"/><i>נאולוגיז</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אשרם"><par n="ה"/><i>אשר</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיפרון"><par n="ה"/><i>ע</i><par n="ע/יפרון__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיקרואורגניזם"><par n="ה"/><i>מיקרואורגניז</i><par n="בו/ם__n_m"/></e>
